Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-4,175
School;
license; requirements.

No driver training school shall be
established nor any existing school be continued unless such school applies
for and obtains from the director a license in the manner and form prescribed
by the director. Rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the director
shall state the requirements for a school license, including requirements
concerning location, equipment, courses of instruction, instructors, financial
statements, schedule of fees and charges, character and reputation of the
operators, insurance, bond, or other security in such sum and with such provisions
as the director deems necessary to protect adequately the interests of the
public, and such other matters as the director may prescribe.

Laws
1967, c. 380, § 3, p. 1192;

R.S.1943, (1988), § 60-409.08;

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 125;

Laws 2008, LB279, § 3.